Massachusetts, session 194th, S2423.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 27-31 the following words:-
No person shall drive any motor vehicle equipped with any television viewer, screen or
other means of visually receiving a television broadcast which is located in the motor vehicle at
any point forward of the back of the driver’s seat, or which is visible to the driver while
operating such motor vehicle.
SECTION 2. Subsection (a) of section 13B of said chapter 90 is hereby amended by
inserting after the third sentence the following sentence:-
No operator of a motor vehicle shall use a mobile electronic device to access social media
or use camera functions, including video calls.
of 3

SECTION 3. Said chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 13D.
(a) No motor vehicle registered in the commonwealth shall be equipped with, nor
shall be used therein, a television receiver, video monitor, or a television or video screen, or any
other similar means of visually displaying a television broadcast or video signal that produces
entertainment or business applications, is operating and is located in the motor vehicle at a point
forward of the back of the driver’s seat, or is operating and the monitor, screen, or display is
visible to the driver while driving the motor vehicle. The operator of a motor vehicle that is not
required to be registered in the commonwealth shall not operate a television receiver, video
monitor, or a television or video screen or any other similar means of visually displaying a
television broadcast or video signal that produces entertainment or business applications that
violates the provisions of this section while driving in the commonwealth.
The prohibitions contained in this subsection shall not, however, include:
1. Electronic displays used in conjunction with vehicle navigation and mapping
systems, or as part of a digital dispatch system;
2. Closed circuit video monitors designed to operate only in conjunction with
dedicated video cameras and used in rear-view systems on trucks, motor homes, and other motor
vehicles;
3. Television receivers or monitors used in government-owned vehicles by law-
enforcement officers in the course of their official duties;
of 3

4. Visual displays used to enhance or supplement the driver’s view forward, behind,
or to the sides of a motor vehicle for the purpose of maneuvering the vehicle;
5. A vehicle information display;
6. A visual display used to enhance or supplement a driver’s view of vehicle
occupants;
7. Television-type receiving equipment used exclusively for safety or traffic
engineering information; or
8. A television receiver, video monitor, television or video screen, or any other
similar means of visually displaying a moving image, if that equipment is factory-installed and
has an interlock device that, when the motor vehicle operator is performing one or more driving
tasks, disables the equipment so that such moving images are not visible to the motor vehicle
operator except as a visual display described in subsections 1 through 7. For the purposes of this
subsection, “driving task” means all of the real time functions required to operate a vehicle in on-
road traffic, excluding the selection of destinations and waypoints, and including steering,
turning, lane keeping and lane changing, accelerating and decelerating.
(b) Except for displays explicitly authorized in subsection b, no driver of any motor
vehicle shall view any motion picture or similar video display while driving.
of 3